New York, session 2025-2026, S6972.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 8 of section 30 of the cannabis law, as amended 2 by chapter 544 of the laws of 2025, is amended and a new subdivision 9 3 is added to read as follows: 4 8. (a) Prior to issuing a certification a practitioner must complete 5 appropriate training as determined by the board in regulation; provided, 6 however, that such course shall, at a minimum, meet the requirements of 7 paragraph (c) of this subdivision. For the purposes of this article a 8 person's status as a practitioner is deemed to be a "license" for the 9 purposes of section thirty-three hundred ninety of the public health law 10 and shall be subject to the same revocation process. 11 (b) The office shall approve at least one course for practitioners 12 seeking to certify patients for medical cannabis, which shall be a mini- 13 mum of two hours in duration. 14 (c) The educational content of such course or courses shall include: 15 the pharmacology of cannabis; contraindications; side effects; adverse 16 reactions; overdose prevention; drug interactions; dosing; routes of 17 administration; risks and benefits; warnings and precautions; abuse and 18 dependence; and such other components as determined by the office. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08994-08-6 S. 6972--B 2 1 9. The office shall provide information on the office's website on the 2 endocannabinoid system awareness program established pursuant to section 3 fifty of this chapter, including the information and guidance estab- 4 lished pursuant to subdivision two of such section. 5 § 2. The cannabis law is amended by adding a new article 3-A to read 6 as follows: 7 ARTICLE 3-A 8 ENDOCANNABINOID SYSTEM AWARENESS PROGRAM 9 Section 50. Endocannabinoid system awareness program. 10 § 50. Endocannabinoid system awareness program. 1. There is hereby 11 established within the office, in consultation with the department of 12 health, the endocannabinoid system awareness program which shall create 13 educational materials for health care practitioners regarding the endo- 14 cannabinoid system and how it interacts with other bodily systems. 15 2. The executive director, in consultation with the commissioner of 16 health, shall create comprehensive information and guidance regarding 17 the endocannabinoid system and how it interacts with other bodily func- 18 tions. Such information and guidance shall include, but not be limited 19 to, the following topics: 20 (a) the endocannabinoid system; 21 (b) cannabinoids, chronic pain and opioids; 22 (c) pharmacogenetics and cannabis; 23 (d) federal food and drug administration (FDA) approved cannabinoid 24 medications; 25 (e) risks, benefits, and impacts of cannabis consumption on body 26 systems; and 27 (f) interactions of cannabis with other medications. 28 § 3. Section 206 of the public health law is amended by adding a new 29 subdivision 32 to read as follows: 30 32. The commissioner shall: 31 (a) send guidance to health care practitioners on the need to be aware 32 of the endocannabinoid system and how it interacts with other bodily 33 functions; and 34 (b) provide information on the department's website on the endocanna- 35 binoid system awareness program, including the information and guidance 36 established pursuant to subdivision two of section fifty of the cannabis 37 law. 38 § 4. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 39 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of 40 any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on 41 its effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before 42 such effective date.